District of Columbia statutes.
25-434

Influencing the application process.

(a)

A person shall not provide, offer to provide, request, or receive anything of value for the personal use, enjoyment, or profit of an individual in exchange for the individual’s promise not to exercise his or her rights provided under this title to object to, or petition against, a license application.

(b)

Any person who violates subsection (a) of this section shall be guilty of a criminal misdemeanor, and, upon conviction, shall be imprisoned for not more than 90 days, or fined not more than the amount set forth in [§ 22-3571.01], or both.

Jan. 24, 1934, ch. 4, § 14a
as added Oct. 3, 1992, D.C. Law 9-174, § 2(d), 39 DCR 5859
May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 284(a), 60 DCR 2064
1981 Ed., § 25-434.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in [§ 22-3571.01]” for “not more than $300” in (b).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 284(a) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.